Tennessee, session 114, HB2203.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 41-2-138, is amended by deleting the
section and substituting instead:
The warden of the workhouse shall file a monthly report, on or before the
fifteenth day of the month immediately following the reporting period, with respect to
each prisoner placed under the work release program with the judge by whom the
prisoner was sentenced advising the judge as to the conduct and financial achievement
of the prisoner.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2203
011658
- 1 -